Hawaii statutes.
§571-43 Additional remedies not pleaded.
When it appears, during the course of any trial, hearing, or proceeding, that
some action or remedy other than or in addition to those indicated by the
petition or other pleadings appears appropriate, the court may, provided all
necessary parties consent, proceed to hear and determine forthwith the
additional or other issues as though originally properly sought and pleaded. [L
1965, c 232, pt of §1; Supp, §333-21; HRS §571-43]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next